California statutes. Education Code
 lunar calendar of each year, or if schools are closed on that date as specified in subdivision (a), on an alternate day determined by the governing board, public schools and educational institutions throughout this state may include exercises, funded through existing resources, acknowledging and celebrating the meaning and importance of Diwali. The State Board of Education may adopt a model curriculum guide to be available for use by public schools for exercises related to Diwali.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 358, Sec. 3.   (AB 268)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

37221.

Unless closed by the governing board pursuant to paragraph (13) of subdivision (a) of Section 37220, the public schools shall remain open on, but shall celebrate with appropriate commemorative exercises, the following holidays:

(a) The anniversary of the adoption of the Constitution of the United States, on or near which date schools shall include exercises and instruction in the purpose, meaning, and importance of the Constitution of the United States, including the Bill of Rights.

(b) March 7, the anniversary of the birthday of Luther Burbank, known as Conservation, Bird, and Arbor Day on which day schools shall include exercises and instruction on the economic value of birds and trees, and the promotion of a spirit of protection toward them, and as to the economic value of natural resources, and the desirability of their conservation.

(c) February 15, the anniversary of the birthday of Susan B. Anthony, known as “Susan B. Anthony Day” on which day schools shall include exercises and instruction on the political and economic status of women in the United States and the contributions of Susan B. Anthony thereto.

(d) March 5, the anniversary of the death of Crispus Attucks, the first black American martyr of the Boston Massacre, known as “Black American Day” on which day schools shall include exercises and instruction on the development of black people in the United States.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1452, Sec. 250.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.

(a) On each day designated and set apart as a day having special significance, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to observe that day and to conduct suitable commemorative exercises.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the exercises encouraged by subdivision (a) be integrated into the regular school program, and be conducted by the school or institution within the amount of time otherwise budgeted for educational programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 51.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.10.

(a) The second Wednesday in May of each year is designated and set apart as the Day of the Teacher, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On the Day of the Teacher, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises commemorating and directing attention to teachers and the teaching profession.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 3.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.11.

(a) April 21 of each year is designated and set apart as John Muir Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On John Muir Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises stressing the importance that an ecologically sound natural environment plays in the quality of life for all of us, and emphasizing John Muir’s significant contributions to the fostering of that awareness and the indelible mark he left on the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 4.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.12.

(a) April 6 of each year is designated and set apart as California Poppy Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On California Poppy Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises honoring the California Poppy, including instruction about native plants, particularly the California Poppy, and the economic and aesthetic value of wildflowers; promoting responsible behavior toward our natural resources and a spirit of protection toward them; and emphasizing the value of natural resources and conservation of natural resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 5.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.13.

(a) May 22 of each year is designated and set apart as Harvey Milk Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Harvey Milk Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Harvey Milk, recognizing his accomplishments, and familiarizing pupils with the contributions he made to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 6.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.14.

(a) March 30 of each year is designated and set apart as Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Welcome Home Vietnam Veterans Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises recognizing the contributions of all those involved in the Vietnam War and remembering the sacrifices they made for their country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 7.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.15.

(a) January 30 of each year is designated and set apart as Fred Korematsu Day of Civil Liberties and the Constitution, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Fred Korematsu Day of Civil Liberties and the Constitution, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Fred Korematsu and recognizing the importance of preserving civil liberties, even in times of real or perceived crisis.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 241, Sec. 8.   (AB 1775)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.16.

(a) February 6 of each year is designated and set apart as Ronald Reagan Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Ronald Reagan Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Ronald Reagan, recognizing his accomplishments, and familiarizing pupils with the contributions he made to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 114, Sec. 8.   (SB 944)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.17.

(a) January 23 of each year is designated and set apart as Ed Roberts Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Ed Roberts Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Ed Roberts, recognizing his accomplishments as well as the accomplishments of other Californians with disabilities, and familiarizing pupils with the contributions that Ed Roberts and other Californians with disabilities have made to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 115, Sec. 8.   (SB 1256)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.18.

(a) October 25 of each year is designated and set apart as Larry Itliong Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Larry Itliong Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Larry Itliong, recognizing his accomplishments, and familiarizing pupils with the contributions he made to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 29, Sec. 2.   (AB 7)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.19.

(a) The date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice of each year, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, is designated and set apart as the Lunar New Year, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On the Lunar New Year, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises recognizing the traditions and cultural significance of the Lunar New Year, the contributions of Asian and Pacific Islander Californians to the state, and any local festivities and celebrations of the occasion.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the exercises encouraged in this section be integrated into the regular school program and be conducted by the public school or educational institution within the amount of time otherwise budgeted for educational programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 199, Sec. 2.   (SB 892)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.20.

(a) April 10 of each year is designated and set apart as Dolores Huerta Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) On Dolores Huerta Day, all public schools and educational institutions are encouraged to conduct exercises remembering the life of Dolores Huerta, recognizing her accomplishments, and familiarizing pupils with the contributions she made to this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   (AB 2644)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

37222.21.

(a) September 11 of each year is designated and set apart as September 11th Remembrance Day, a day having special significance pursuant to Section 37222.

(b) When September 11th Remembrance Day falls on a schoolday, each public elementary and secondary school is encouraged to observe a moment of silence at an appropriate time while school is in session.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 102, Sec. 1.   (SB 254)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

37223.

(a) The governing board of any elementary, high school, or unified school district or any county superintendent of schools may maintain classes on Saturday or Sunday, or both. The classes maintained pursuant to this section may include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) Continuation classes.

(2) Special day classes for mentally gifted minors.

(3) Makeup classes for absences occurring during the week.

(4) The programs of a regional occupational center or regional occupational program.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this code, the attendance of any pupil in a class or program held on a Saturday or Sunday shall not result in the crediting of more than five days of attendance for the pupil per week.

(c) Attendance at classes conducted on Saturday or Sunday, or both, shall be at the election of the pupil or, in the case of a minor pupil, the parent or guardian of the pupil. However, the governing board may require truants, as defined by Section 48260, to attend makeup classes conducted on one day of a weekend.

(d) Except as otherwise provided in this code, any class that is offered on a Saturday or Sunday shall be one offered during the regular Monday through Friday school week.

(e) The voluntary attendance of pupils enrolled in programs for gifted and talented pupils in special
 educational activities conducted on Saturday or Sunday shall not be included in the computation of the average daily attendance of the school district.

(f) Subdivisions (b) and (d) shall not apply to regional occupational centers or programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 301, Sec. 8.   (SB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Continuous School Programs [37600. - 37644.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [37600. - 37600.]

37600.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to authorize public school districts of any type or class to establish, maintain, and operate their educational program under a continuous school program, to be conducted throughout the entire school year.

The Legislature is especially concerned and aware of the mounting costs of acquisition and construction of school sites and facilities, and is, therefore, desirous of providing a procedure whereby those fiscal burdens may be reduced by increased utilization of existing plants and facilities.

The Legislature is also interested in providing for the replacement of the present system of lengthy summer vacations with shorter periodic vacation periods, which will result in a reduction of the student’s summer vacation “learning loss.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Establishment and Maintenance [37610. - 37620.]

37610.

The governing board of any school district may, after notification to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, establish and operate in one or more of the schools within the district, or in all schools within the district, a continuous school program pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37611.

Whenever the governing board of any school district, pursuant to Section 37610, determines to operate one or more schools of the district on a continuous school program in such a manner as to require any pupil to enroll in a continuous school program, it shall publish, not later than November 1st of the school year preceding the commencement of such a program, its intention to operate a continuous school program in such a manner as to require any pupil to enroll in a continuous school program in a newspaper of general circulation within the district, or if there is no such newspaper, then in any newspaper of general circulation that is regularly circulated in the district.

Publication of notice pursuant to this section shall be once each week for three successive weeks. Three publications in a newspaper regularly published once a week or oftener, with at least five days intervening between the respective publication date not counting such publication dates, are sufficient.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37612.

If after notice of intention has been given to establish and operate a continuous school program in a manner so as to require any pupil to enroll in a continuous school program, a petition signed by 25 percent of the registered voters of the district may be presented to the county superintendent of schools requesting that the school district not establish that program. This petition shall be presented no later than December 10th of the year in which the notice is given.

The county superintendent of schools shall examine the petition and, if he or she finds it to be sufficient and signed as required by law, order a ballot proposition, as provided by Section 37614, to be placed upon the ballot of the appropriate election as provided in Section 37613.

The governing board of the school district may request that an election be called and conducted irrespective of whether or not a petition is presented.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 970, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

37613.

An election ordered or requested to be held pursuant to Section 37612 may be consolidated with the next districtwide election held 80 or more days after the order or request for an election is made or the county superintendent of schools may order a special election to be held at least 80 days after the election is ordered or requested.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37614.

(a) The ballot proposition used in an election called pursuant to Section 37613 shall contain the words “For the continuous school program of the (name of district) District to be operated in such a manner as to require any pupil to enroll in a continuous school program” followed by the words “Yes” and “No” so placed that the voter may clearly indicate his choice.

(b) If a majority of those voting for the ballot proposition, as provided by subdivision (a), at the election vote “yes” then the school district shall be permitted to commence the continuous school program so designated on the ballot and to continue operating any such program in the district until all such programs are terminated.

(c) If a majority of those voting for the ballot proposition, as provided by subdivision (a), at the election vote “no” then the school district shall not be permitted to commence the continuous school program so designated on the ballot.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37615.

If a continuous school program operated in such a manner as to require any pupil to enroll in the program is terminated by the governing board or prohibited pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 37614, the governing board shall not determine to operate one or more schools of the district on a continuous school program in such a manner as to require any pupil to enroll in a continuous school program for at least two years following termination or election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37616.

Prior to implementing a continuous school program in any school of the district, the school district governing board shall consult in good faith in an effort to reach agreement with the certificated and classified employees of the school, with the parents of pupils who would be affected by the change, and with the community at large. Such consultation shall include at least one public hearing for which the board has given adequate notice to the employees and to the parents of pupils affected.

In school districts where a continuous school program is implemented in fewer than all of the schools maintained by the school district, the governing board of such a school district shall make every reasonable effort to assign certificated employees who prefer the regular school schedule to schools of the same level retaining the regular school schedule.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37617.

The governing board of any school district operating pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall divide the students of each selected school into as many groups as necessary to adequately accommodate a continuous school program so established and conducted. Students of the same family shall be placed in the same group unless one or more of such students is enrolled in a special education class or unless the parent or guardian of such students requests that the students be placed in different groups.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37618.

The governing board of any school district operating pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall establish a school calendar whereby the teaching sessions and vacation period during the school year are on a rotating basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37619.

Each selected school shall be closed for all students and employees on regular school holidays specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 37220) of Chapter 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

37620.

The teaching sessions and vacation periods established pursuant to Section 37618 shall be established without reference to the school year as defined in Section 37200. The schools and classes shall be conducted for a total of no fewer than 175 days during the academic year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Elements [37630. - 37632.]

37630.

The provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 48200), Article 3 (commencing with Section 48220) to Article 6 (commencing with Section 48290) of Chapter 2 of Part 27 of Division 4 of this title, and all other laws, relating to compulsory full-time education and the enrollment and attendance of pupils in the kindergarten, elementary, and secondary grades shall be applicable with respect to the regular schooldays prescribed for the entire academic year established for the school at which a program pursuant to this chapter is conducted, and to the attendance area established for such school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37631.

The courses of instruction offered at a school maintained pursuant to this chapter shall meet all applicable requirements of law, including the requirements prescribed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 51200) of Part 28 relating to physical education and Chapter 5.6 (commencing with Section 51930) of Part 28. For these purposes the instructional program shall be designed to provide at least the overall equivalent in instruction in each course of study required by law to be provided in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, upon the completion by a pupil of the work prescribed for any particular grade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 650, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37632.

The governing board of any school district operating the continuous school program pursuant to this chapter shall prescribe a separate salary schedule for the certificated employees of the district who are employed at any school maintaining the continuous school program pursuant to this chapter, and who, because of such employment, will be engaged in rendering services for the district for a greater number of total days during the academic year than would be the case for a regular academic year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Finances [37640. - 37644.]

37640.

Each school district maintaining a continuous school program in any school within the district pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to receive the same support, but not more support, from the State School Fund due to the average daily attendance at such school that it would have received if the school had been operating under the provisions of law relating to the regular school year, including summer school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37641.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall prescribe an appropriate procedure for the computation of allowances, apportionments, and disbursements from the State School Fund which are to be made to any school district maintaining a continuous school program pursuant to this chapter for any one or more of the purposes specified in Sections 41300 and 41301 for the average daily attendance at any school operating such a program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37642.

The allowances, disbursements, and apportionments under this article shall be made with respect to any school district maintaining a continuous school program pursuant to this chapter in accordance with the provisions of law relating to such allowances, disbursements, and apportionments, to the extent possible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37643.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction may provide for the actual disbursement of the apportionments to the school district maintaining the continuous school program pursuant to this chapter at times other than as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 41330) of Chapter 3 of Part 24 of this division. In no event, however, shall the school district receive apportionments in a total amount in excess of the amount determined pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

37644.

Any school district with an average daily attendance of more than 500 which, prior to July 1, 1979, converts one or more schools to a continuous school program pursuant to this chapter, shall, upon the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, receive from funds appropriated for this purpose, a one-time grant not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000). School districts already operating continuous school programs on effective date of this section shall be eligible for the grant.

Any school district with an average daily attendance of 500 or less, which, prior to July 1, 1979, converts one or more schools to a continuous school program pursuant to this chapter, shall, upon the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, receive from funds appropriated for this purpose, a one-time grant not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Year-Round Scheduling [37670. - 37695.]



  ARTICLE 1. Multitrack Year-Round Scheduling [37670. - 37672.]

37670.

(a) Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 37680), a school district may operate a program of multitrack year-round scheduling at one or more schools within the district. A program of multitrack year-round scheduling may operate at a schoolsite for as few as 163 days in each fiscal year if the governing board of the school district adopts a resolution at a regularly scheduled board meeting certifying that both of the following criteria are met at the schoolsite:

(1) The number of annual instructional minutes is not less than that of schools of the same grade levels utilizing the traditional school calendar.

(2) It is not possible for the school to maintain a multitrack schedule containing the same number of instructional days as are provided in schools of the district utilizing the traditional school calendar given the facilities, program, class sizes, and projected number of pupils enrolled at the schoolsite.

(b) A certificated employee working under a program described in this section, except one serving under an administrative or supervisorial credential who is assigned full time to a school in a position requiring qualifications for certification, shall work the same number of days and shall increase the number of minutes worked daily on a uniform basis.

(c) A program conducted pursuant to this section is eligible for apportionment from the State School Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37671.

Schools in programs conducted pursuant to Section 37670 shall be exempted from the requirements of Section 37202.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 756, Sec. 6.   Effective October 9, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

37672.

(a) No pupil participating in programs as described in Section 37670 shall be credited with more than one day of attendance in any calendar day, except as permitted in Section 46140.

Average daily attendance generated in the regular elementary, junior high, and high schools operated under Section 37670 shall be calculated as prescribed in subdivision (a) of Section 41601.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 37640, subdivision (a) of Section 41601, and any other provision of law, the number of days taught in one or more late entry makeup classes in which a pupil in a program of year-round scheduling is enrolled shall be disregarded, at the option of a school district, in calculating the number of days taught in the calculation of average daily attendance of that district for any school year, if the pupil entered the program of year-round scheduling after September 1 of that school year and the track in which the pupil is enrolled began instruction in July or August of that school year. For purposes of this subdivision, “late entry makeup class” is a class in which a pupil in a program of year-round scheduling is enrolled in order to compensate for the pupil’s late enrollment in that program. The number of days taught that are disregarded under this subdivision shall not exceed the number of schooldays occurring in the school year prior to September 1 in the track in which the pupil is enrolled, reduced by the number of schooldays, if any, occurring in a program operating under the traditional school calendar in which the pupil was enrolled in that school district in the same school year prior to the date upon which the pupil is first enrolled in the program of year-round scheduling.

(c) This subdivision shall only apply to school districts with an average daily attendance of 100,001 or more pupils that have installed an individual pupil tracking system and maintain schools on both the traditional calendar and on year-round calendars. For the 1993–94 and 1994–95 fiscal years, if a pupil transfers to another school within the district, other than a transfer initiated by the district, the pupil’s average daily attendance shall be calculated independently for each school in which the pupil was enrolled. For the 1993–94 fiscal year as recertified at the time of the first principal apportionment in February of 1995 and for the 1994–95 fiscal year, in no event may any transferring pupil generate more than 0.98 unit of average daily attendance for the district in any one school year under this subdivision. In no event shall this subdivision be construed to authorize any nontransferring pupil to generate more than one unit of average daily attendance for any school year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Concept 6 Class Scheduling [37680. - 37695.]

37680.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Capacity-related busing” means transporting a pupil to a school other than the school of residence in order to reduce the number of pupils attending the school of residence.

(b) “Circumstances beyond the control of the district” means any of the following:

(1) An increase in pupil population beyond the demographic projections set forth in the district’s comprehensive action plan, or an amendment thereto, if the increase was not reasonably foreseeable through the use of annual, informed reestimates of demographic projections.

(2) A cost escalation, shortage in construction material or capacity, delay in completion of an environmental review, or natural or human-made disaster materially affecting the district’s facilities program, if the circumstance was not reasonably foreseeable and the district exercised due diligence in planning for that circumstance.

(3) A lack of sufficient state or local funds to complete necessary school construction. “Lack of sufficient state or local funds” may not be substantiated if a district expends state or local funds designated for new construction for any purpose other than the construction of additional school facilities to reduce reliance on the Concept 6 program, except for funds for projects eligible to receive facility hardship funds pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 17075.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10.

(c) “Comprehensive action plan” means the plan developed pursuant to Section 37682.

(d) “Concept 6” means a program whereby a school operates on a three-track year-round calendar in which each track provides fewer than 180 days, but no fewer than 163 days, of instruction per school year.

(e) “Specific school building plan” means both of the following:

(1) The district has identified preferred sites and has approved projects, as required under the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), needed to satisfy the pupil capacity projected in the district’s comprehensive action plan.

(2) The district has identified and obtained the funding necessary to complete the particular projects identified. If state funding is part of the funding identified, a district is deemed to have obtained state funding if it has received either of the following:

(A) An apportionment from the state for the project.

(B) A preliminary apportionment for the project under the Critically Overcrowded School Facilities Program, as set forth in Article 11 (commencing with Section 17078.10) of Chapter 12.5 of Part 10.

(f) “State board” means the State Board of Education.

(g) “Substantial progress” means achieving a total enrollment on Concept 6 calendars of no more than 110 percent of the annual numerical goals set forth in the district’s comprehensive action plan.

(h) “Technical assistance” includes, but is not limited to, assistance in identifying and acquiring a schoolsite, guidance in maximizing access to funding, and facilitating the process of obtaining state approval for new construction projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37681.

(a) Commencing with the 2004–05 school year, a school district may not operate a Concept 6 program, unless the school district operated a Concept 6 program continuously since the 2003–04 school year.

(b) A school initially operating on or after July 1, 2004, may not operate a Concept 6 program if operation of the program would increase the number of schools in the district operating a Concept 6 program above the number in operation in the district, on average, over the preceding two school years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37682.

(a) As a condition of operating a Concept 6 program at a school in the 2004–05 school year or thereafter, a district shall, by January 1, 2005, present to the department a comprehensive action plan detailing the strategy and steps to be taken annually to eliminate the use of the Concept 6 program as soon as practicable, and no later than July 1, 2012. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the action plan shall include all of the following:

(1) An analysis of the factors relating to the district’s current and projected operation of the Concept 6 program including, but not limited to, demographic forecasts, space use and needs, class sizes, programmatic constraints, facility construction status, the amount of funding needed to create additional classroom space, and the proposed sources of that funding.

(2) A detailed description of the multiple phases of planning and construction, including site identification, site acquisition, construction commencement and completion date, and occupancy dates of projects designed to eliminate use of the Concept 6 program, including a reasonable projection of the number of additional pupil seats to be provided through each of the multiple phases of planning and construction.

(3) Reasonable, districtwide numerical goals against which annual progress toward eliminating the use of the Concept 6 program can be measured, including a projection of the number of pupils, if any, the district estimates will remain on a Concept 6 program on July 1 of each year through 2012.

(b) If a district projects that it will eliminate the Concept 6 program on or before July 1, 2008, the district shall not be required to include in its comprehensive action plan the information contained in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) but, instead, shall include a narrative explanation of the manner in which it will accomplish its goal to eliminate the Concept 6 program and shall project the date that each school in the district will eliminate the program.

(c) A district may not transport pupils to another school more than 40 minutes away from the school of residence, other than as required pursuant to a desegregation plan, as a means to eliminate the Concept 6 program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37683.

(a) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall evaluate a comprehensive action plan submitted by a district and shall make recommendations to the state board for approval or disapproval of the plan. The evaluation shall be based on the reasonableness and practicability of the district in eliminating the Concept 6 program by the earliest practicable date and no later than July 1, 2012. The evaluation shall include an analysis of whether adequate sources of funding have been identified for the projects necessary to eliminate the program. In considering whether a district has identified adequate sources of funding, the superintendent shall consult with the Office of Public School Construction.

(b) If the state board disapproves a comprehensive action plan, it shall specify the reasons for the disapproval and require the district to submit a revised plan, within a time specified by the state board, to address the state board’s concerns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37684.

(a) A district operating a Concept 6 program shall report each January to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, who shall report to the state board, on progress made in reaching the annual numerical goals established in its comprehensive action plan. If a district fails to meet an annual numerical goal, the district shall identify the specific cause of the failure and amend its comprehensive action plan to indicate the specific steps that it will take to remedy that failure so that it will meet its deadline to eliminate the Concept 6 program as stated in its comprehensive action plan.

(b) If the district’s progress toward meeting its numerical goals has or is projected to change materially, the district shall file a supplemental, mid-year report with the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The report shall describe the nature and cause of the material change and indicate the specific steps that the district will take, and the state technical assistance needed, if any, to address the change. The superintendent shall evaluate the supplemental, mid-year report and make recommendations to the state board for approval or disapproval. The evaluation shall be based on the reasonableness and practicability of the district to reach its annual goals and eliminate the Concept 6 program by the earliest practicable date, and no later than July 1, 2012. If the state board disapproves a report, it shall specify the reasons for disapproval and require the district to submit a revised report, within a timeframe specified by the state board, to address the concerns raised by the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

37685.

(a) A district that plans to operate a Concept 6 program after June 30, 2006, shall, by July 1, 2006, and by July 1 of any succeeding year in which it plans to operate a Concept 6 program, as a condition of operating that program, submit evidence in writing to establish to the satisfaction of the Superintendent of Public Instruction that substantial progress has been made toward meeting its annual numerical goals as stated in its comprehensive action plan.

(b) The superintendent shall evaluate the written submission to determine whether the district has made substantial progress toward meeting its goals and shall submit a report to the state board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 901, Sec. 3.   Effective September 29, 2004.)